Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.900.101

Statutory references—1990 c 33.

(1) The code reviser shall correct all statutory references to code sections recodified by *section 4 of this act.

(2)(a) References to "RCW 28A.47.732 through 28A.47.748" in Title 28A RCW have intentionally not been changed since those code sections were repealed by chapter 189, Laws of 1983. These references are not being eliminated because it is not the purpose of this act to correct obsolete references.

(b) References to "RCW 28A.58.095" in Title 28A RCW have intentionally not been changed since that code section was repealed by chapter 2, Laws of 1987 1st ex. sess. These references are not being eliminated because it is not the purpose of this act to correct obsolete references.

[ 1990 c 33 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 4 of this act is an uncodified section that recodifies sections in Title 28A RCW.